North Dakota, session 69, HB1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-03-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-03-10. Publication of abstract of annual statement and certificate of authority.
An insurance company, at the time it submits its annual statement for filing, shall submit an abstract
of the annual statement for publication uponon the form prescribed by the commissioner. The abstract
of the annual statement of each company, other than a state or county mutual insurance company, must
be published at least three times in onea newspaper of general circulation, designated by the
commissioner, printed and published in each judicial district in this state in which the company has an
agency and evenly distributed for publication across all newspapers operating in the judicial district. The
abstract of the annual statement of each state or county mutual insurance company must be published
once in a newspaper published in the county in which the company has its principal place of business,
the newspaper to be designated by the members of the company at their annual meeting. The
certificate of authority issued by the commissioner to authorize the company to do business within this
state must be published in connection with the publication of the abstract of its annual statement. The
fees for publication are those provided under section 46-05-03. Proof of publication must be filed with
the commissioner within four months after the filing of the annual statement. The commissioner shall
provide abstracts, in a convenient form, on the commissioner's website.

H. B. NO. 1398 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1398.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 6 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State